New Jersey, session 222, S3511.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2009, c.237 (C.45:15C-12) is amended to read as follows: 2.    For the purposes of this act: "Board" means the New Jersey Board of Tree Experts established pursuant to section 3 of [this act]P.L.2009, c.237 (C.45:15C-13). "Licensed tree care operator" means a person licensed to provide tree care operator services in the State pursuant to subsection b. of section 7 of [this act]P.L.2009, c.237 (C.45:15C-17). "Licensed tree expert" means a person licensed to provide tree expert services in this State pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of [this act]P.L.2009, c.237 (C.45:15C-17). "Tree care operator services" means and includes tree pruning, repairing, brush cutting or removal, tree removal, and stump [grinding or] removal.  Tree care operator services shall not include stump grinding. "Tree care services" means tree care operator services and tree expert services as established by [this act]P.L.2009, c.237 (C.45:15C-11 et seq.). "Tree expert services" means and includes tree pruning, repairing, brush cutting or removal, tree removal, stump [grinding or] removal, tree establishment, fertilization, cabling and bracing, lightning protection, consulting, diagnosis, and treatment of tree problems or diseases, tree management during site planning and development, tree assessment and risk management, and application of pesticides or any other form of tree maintenance.  Tree expert services shall not include stump grinding. (cf: P.L.2009, c.237, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.